Utah statutes.
79-2-302.   Fees.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the department may adopt a schedule
of fees assessed for services provided by the department.
(2)  A fee described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be reasonable and fair; and
(b)  reflect the cost of services provided.
(3)  The department shall submit a fee established under this section to the
Legislature as part of the department's annual appropriations request.
(4)  The department may not charge or collect a fee established under this
section without approval of the Legislature.
